Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-323
Board of adjustment; adopt rules; meetings; oaths; public hearings; record of proceedings.

The board shall adopt rules in accordance with the provisions of the ordinance or resolution by which it was created. Meetings of the board shall be held at the call of the chairman and at such other times as the board may determine. The chairman, or in his absence the acting chairman, may administer oaths and compel the attendance of witnesses. All hearings of the board shall be public. The board shall keep minutes of its proceedings, showing the vote of each member upon each question or, if absent or failing to vote, indicating such fact. It shall also keep records of its examinations and other official actions. Such minutes and records shall immediately be filed in the office of the board and be a public record.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 10(4), p. 688.